Mississippi statutes. Title 61. Aviation
Support of Airport Facilities for State University and Colleges

§ 61-5-71.
Declaration of public policy; legislative intent.

It shall be the public policy of this state to encourage the construction, equipping, maintenance and operation of adequate transportation facilities, including airports, if needed, for use of the state university and the state supported four year colleges now or hereafter located in the state, as necessary in the operation and training program of such university and colleges and desirable for the use of the municipalities and areas in or near which such airports may be located as well as being helpful in the economic, industrial and business development of said counties. It is the intent of Sections 61-5-71 through 61-5-77 to provide means whereby the board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning, the state building commission and any and all other state agencies which have either constructed such airport facilities, or contemplate so doing, may obtain assistance and contributions of funds from any municipality in or near which any such college may be located and from the county in which any such airport facilities may be located. It is also the intent of said sections to authorize such municipalities and counties to borrow money and issue bonds, under their respective bond laws, to provide funds for the purpose of aiding and assisting in the acquisition of sites for such airports, construction of buildings, construction of runways and extension of runways and in constructing and equipping all facilities needed or desirable for such airports.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7536.5; Laws, 1957, Ex. Sess. ch. 13, § 1.

§ 61-5-73.
Powers of counties.

The boards of supervisors of the several counties of the state are authorized, in their discretion, to acquire by condemnation, donation, lease or purchase land to be used as an airport or landing place for airplanes. They may erect such buildings thereon as they may deem necessary for such purpose, and equip and maintain such airport.

The boards of supervisors of the several counties of the state, wherein the university or other state supported four year colleges now or hereafter in existence, are or shall be located, are authorized, in their discretion, to assist the board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning, the state building commission or any other state agency by contributing county funds to be used in the acquisition of a site for an airport, erecting suitable buildings, building or extending runways and equipping, maintaining and operating an airport, which shall be available for the use of said university or colleges, as the case may be, and for the general public.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3571; 1942, § 7537; Laws, 1928, ch. 63; Laws, 1957, Ex. Sess. ch. 13, § 2.

§ 61-5-75.
Powers of municipalities.

The governing authorities of any municipality are authorized, in their discretion, to exercise all the powers conferred on boards of supervisors with reference to acquiring land to be used as an airport or landing place for airplanes, and erect suitable buildings thereon, and equip and maintain such airport. They may acquire airports or landing places already established. Such airport or landing place may be situated beyond the limits of such municipality. The governing authorities of a municipality may lease, or sublease, or contract the maintenance and operation of, any airport or landing place for airplanes to the United States of America, or any department or agency thereof, or to any person, firm, association, or corporation, for the purpose of training aviators and for other legal purposes. The county wherein such airport may be situated is hereby authorized to make such contribution to the cost of acquiring the necessary land for such airport, the placing of same in suitable condition, and the equipping and maintenance thereof, as the board of supervisors of such county and the governing body of such municipality may mutually agree upon.

The governing authorities of the several municipalities of the state in or near which the state university or a state supported four year college, now or hereafter in existence, are or shall be located, are authorized, in their discretion, to assist the board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning, the state building commission or any other state agency by contributing municipal funds to be used in the acquisition of a site for an airport, erecting suitable buildings and building or extending runways, equipping, maintaining and operating an airport, which shall be available for the use of said university or colleges, as the case may be, and for the general public.

Any such municipality which offers assistance in the acquisition of a site for constructing suitable buildings, building or extending runways or maintaining and operating such airports for the university or other state supported colleges, as the case may be, may or may not be in the county in which the university or the state supported four year college is located, provided the airport is not more than ten miles from said municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3572; 1942, §§ 7538, 7538.1; Laws, 1928, ch. 63; Laws, 1942, ch. 174; Laws, 1946, ch. 231, § 1; Laws, 1957, Ex. Sess. ch. 13, §§ 3, 7.

§ 61-5-77.
Construction.

Sections 61-5-71 through 61-5-75 are remedial, are entitled to a liberal construction, and are supplemental and in addition to all other laws on the subject. In event, however, said sections are in conflict with any other law, they shall take precedence, in order to accomplish the purpose of development for which they are expressly written.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7538.2; Laws, 1957, Ex. Sess. ch. 13, § 8.